Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 2A Utility Finance Section

46-2-40.
Creation of Utility Finance Section; composition of section.

There is established a Utility Finance Section of the commission staff, which section shall have the powers and duties specified in this article. The section shall consist of a director, an assistant director, and such accountants, statisticians, experts, and clerical personnel as the commission may employ, as authorized by the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-201a, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 4.

46-2-41.
Appointment of director of Utility Finance Section; compensation; supervisory role of director of utilities; qualifications and responsibilities of director of section generally.

On or before December 31, 1981, the commission by order shall employ an individual qualified by knowledge and experience to serve as director of the Utility Finance Section. The director shall be compensated in an amount determined by the commission. He shall serve at the pleasure of the commission and shall report to the director of utilities of the commission.

The director of the Utility Finance Section must possess at least five years’ experience in the field of public regulation of business, whether through employment with a state or federal agency, in industry, in education, or through the practice of law. This individual must have graduated from a four-year college with a major in either accounting, finance, business, or management or have graduated from a law school and been admitted to the State Bar of Georgia.

The director shall be responsible for the:

Preparation of the budget of the section for submittal to the director of utilities;

Administration of the section;

Supervision of the work of the section; and

Presentation of the commission staff’s position during electric utility rate proceedings.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-202a, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1174, §§ 1, 2.

46-2-42.
Employment of assistant director of Utility Finance Section; employment of accountants, statisticians, experts, and clerical personnel; application of rules and regulations.

The director of the Utility Finance Section shall employ an assistant director who shall be employed at the pleasure of the commission and as provided by law.

The director shall employ such accountants, statisticians, experts, and clerical personnel as are necessary for the effective performance of the duties of the section, and such employees shall be in the unclassified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2.

Rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board concerning compensation and promotion shall not apply to employees of the Utility Finance Section.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-203a, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-87/HB 642.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “state merit system” twice in subsection (c).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added “, and such employees shall be in the unclassified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2” at the end of subsection (b); and substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “With the concurrence of the State Personnel Administration compensation board, certain employees of the section may be included in the ‘unclassified service’ in addition to those currently provided by paragraph (15) of Code Section 45-20-2. The State Personnel Administration regulations and restrictions concerning compensation and promotion shall not apply to such employees.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

46-2-43.
Director, assistant director, or any other employee of Utility Finance Section prohibited from having any interest in or being employed by electric utilities.

During the period of his employment and for one year following the termination of his employment, neither the director of the Utility Finance Section, the assistant director of the section, nor any other employee of the section shall own any interest of any kind in or be retained or employed by any electric utility or own any controlling interest in or be retained or employed by any person who has a vested interest in the outcome of any proceeding in which the section participates.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-204a, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 4.

Cross references.

Conflicts of interest of state officers and employees generally, § 45-10-20 et seq.

46-2-44.
Duties of Utility Finance Section generally.

The duties of the Utility Finance Section shall include the following:

Preparing a budget for the section for submission by the director of the section to the director of utilities to secure the necessary appropriations to finance the activities of the section;

Investigating the rates and auditing the books and records of any electric utility other than transportation utilities, municipal electric systems, and electric membership corporations when so directed by the director of utilities;

Appearing in any proceeding to determine rates of an electric utility. In such capacity, the section shall:

Form an independent evaluation concerning whether the electric utility rates in question are just and reasonable;

Present testimony by its employees or specially retained experts concerning the electric utility rates in question;

Provide to the commission all technical assistance, data, and calculations concerning the electric utility rates in question, as the commission may require;

Assist the commission in any judicial review of a commission determination of the rates of an electric utility; and

When it will not interfere with the section’s participation in utility rate proceedings, perform such other duties regarding any utility matter which the director of utilities may establish.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-205a, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 4.

46-2-45.
Relationship of Utility Finance Section to commission.

The Utility Finance Section shall have the following authority and relationship to the commission:

The section shall be part of the commission staff; and

The section shall be deemed a party to any proceeding to consider rates in which it participates, provided that it shall not have standing to appeal or contest the final order entered by the commission in such a proceeding.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-206a, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 4.